Alabama, session 2026rs, HB128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
9 Section 1. Section 34-19-12, as last amended by Act
10 2025-166, 2025 Regular Session, and Sections 34-19-14 and
11 34-19-16, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as
12 follows:
13 "§34-19-12
14 (a) There is created and established a State Board of
15 Midwifery to implement and administer this chapter.
16 (b) The board shall pay all of its expenses from its
17 own funds and no expenses shall be borne by the State of
18 Alabama from the State General Fund.
19 (c) The board shall consist of seven members appointed
20 by the Governor and subject to confirmation by the Senate,
21 from a list of qualified individuals nominated by the
22 designated organization. Each list shall contain the names of
23 at least two individuals for each position to be filled.
24 (d) The members of the board shall be appointed for
25 staggered initial terms and subsequent terms shall be for a
26 minimum of four years or until his or her successor has been
27 appointed and qualified.
28 (e) The board shall meet at least twice each year,
Page 1

(e) The board shall meet at least twice each year,
HB128 Enrolled
29 conducting its business in person or by electronic methods.
30 (f) The board shall elect one of its members to serve
31 as chair for a two-year term. The chair may not serve
32 consecutive terms.
33 (g) The composition of the board shall be as follows:
34 (1) Four members shall hold a valid certified
35 professional midwife credential from the North American
36 Registry of Midwives. These members shall be appointed from a
37 list of names submitted by the Alabama Birth CoalitionMidwives
38 Alliance or its successor professional midwifery organization.
39 One of these members shall be appointed to an initial term of
40 four years, one to a term of three years, and two to a term of
41 two years.
42 (2) One member shall be a nurse practitioner. This
43 member shall be appointed to an initial term of four years.
44 (3) One member shall be a licensed certified nurse
45 midwife or registered nurse licensed under Article 5 of
46 Chapter 21. This member shall be appointed from a list
47 submitted by the Alabama Board of Nursing. This member shall
48 be appointed to an initial term of three years.
49 (4) One member shall have used midwifery services in
50 the state. This member shall be appointed from a list of names
51 submitted by the Alabama Birth Coalition. This member shall be
52 appointed to an initial term of three years.
53 (h) When choosing individuals to be considered by the
54 Governor for appointment to the board, the nominating
55 authorities shall strive to assure membership is inclusive and
56 reflects the racial, gender, geographic, urban, rural, and
Page 2

reflects the racial, gender, geographic, urban, rural, and
HB128 Enrolled
57 economic diversity of the state. Commencing on June 1, 2025,
58 as the terms of the members serving on the board expire, the
59 membership of the board shall be appointed so that one member
60 resides in and is appointed from each congressional district
61 in this state.
62 (i) All members of the board shall be immune from
63 individual civil liability while acting within the scope of
64 their duties as board members, unless conduct is unreasonable.
65 (j) Vacancies shall be filled by the Governor and
66 confirmed by the Senate in the same manner as other
67 appointments are made. In the case of a vacancy, the new
68 appointee shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.
69 (k) Members of the board shall serve without
70 compensation but shall be allowed travel and per diem expenses
71 at the same rate paid to state employees, to be paid from the
72 funds collected for the administration of this chapter, as
73 funds are available.
74 (l) The board may employ, subject to the State Merit
75 System, investigators, inspectors, attorneys, and any other
76 agents, employees, and assistants as may from time to time be
77 necessary, and may use any other means necessary to enforce
78 this chapter.
79 (m) Pursuant to any terms and conditions adopted by the
80 board by official resolution, the board may accept gifts and
81 grants.
82 (m)(n)(1) A licensed midwife shall file annually with
83 the board the following information on a form prepared by the
84 board and accessible on its website:
Page 3

board and accessible on its website:
HB128 Enrolled
85 a. The total number of births attended by the licensed
86 midwife in the previous year, including births where the
87 licensed midwife was assisting another licensed midwife.
88 b. The number of maternal transfers to a health care
89 facility from births attended by the licensed midwife,
90 including instances where the licensed midwife was assisting
91 another licensed midwife.
92 c. The number of infant transfers to a health care
93 facility from births attended by the licensed midwife,
94 including instances where the licensed midwife was assisting
95 another licensed midwife.
96 d. The total number of maternal deaths from births
97 attended by the licensed midwife, including instances where
98 the licensed midwife was assisting another licensed midwife.
99 e. The total number of infant deaths from births
100 attended by the licensed midwife, including instances where
101 the licensed midwife was assisting another licensed midwife.
102 (2) The board shall make the information collected
103 under this subsection available to the public in accordance
104 with federal law.
105 (n)(o) The board shall be subject to the Alabama Sunset
106 Law, Chapter 20, Title 41, as an enumerated agency as provided
107 in Section 41-20-3, and shall have a termination date of
108 October 1, 2021, and every four years thereafter, unless
109 continued pursuant to the Alabama Sunset Law."
110 "§34-19-14
111 (a) The board shall do all of the following consistent
112 with this chapter:
Page 4

with this chapter:
HB128 Enrolled
113 (1) Approve, renew, suspend, or revoke licenses for the
114 practice of midwifery.
115 (2) Investigate and conduct hearings regarding
116 complaints against a licensed midwife in order to determine if
117 disciplinary action is warranted.
118 (3) Establish reasonable licensure fees, including, but
119 not limited to, initial application, renewal, and
120 reinstatement fees.
121 (4) Develop standardized forms, including, but not
122 limited to, a midwife disclosure form, informed consent form,
123 emergency care form, and applications for licensure and
124 renewal.
125 (5) Impose administrative fines, not to exceed one
126 thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation, for violating this
127 chapter, a board rule, or a condition of a license.
128 (6) Establish levels of professional liability
129 insurance that must be maintained by a licensed midwife at a
130 limit of no less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000)
131 per occurrence and three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000)
132 aggregate.
133 (b)(1) The board shall adopt rules pursuant to the
134 Administrative Procedure Act to implement this chapter in a
135 manner consistent with the most current North American
136 Registry of Midwives Job Analysis and with essential documents
137 developed and published by the Midwives Alliance of North
138 America. The rules shall include, but not be limited to,
139 provision for all of the following:
140 a. Licensing procedures and requirements.
Page 5

a. Licensing procedures and requirements.
HB128 Enrolled
141 b. Minimum initial and continuing education
142 requirements for licensure.
143 c. Standards by which a licensed midwife shall conduct
144 risk assessment.
145 d. Standards for professional conduct.
146 e. A standard procedure for investigating complaints.
147 f. Requirements for clinical internships for
148 individuals seeking midwifery training.
149 (2) The rules shall ensure independent practice.
150 (c) A licensed midwife may not administer or perform
151 any of the following obstetric procedures which are outside of
152 the scope of the licensed practice of midwifery:
153 (1) An epidural, spinal, or caudal anesthetic.
154 (2) Any type of narcotic analgesia.
155 (3) Forceps or a vacuum extractor-assisted delivery.
156 (4) Abortion.
157 (5) Cesarean section or any surgery or surgical
158 deliverdelivery except minimal episiotomies.
159 (6) Pharmacological induction or augmentation of labor
160 or artificial rupture of membranes prior to the onset of
161 labor.
162 (7) Except for the administration of local anesthetic,
163 administration of an anesthetic.
164 (8) Administration of any prescription medication in a
165 manner that violates the Alabama Uniform Controlled
166 SubstanceSubstances Act.
167 (9) Vaginal birth after a cesarean.
168 (d) A licensed midwife may not perform either of the
Page 6

(d) A licensed midwife may not perform either of the
HB128 Enrolled
169 following:
170 (1) Delivery of a diagnosed multiple pregnancy.
171 (2) Delivery of a baby whose position is diagnosed as
172 non-cephalic at the onset of labor."
173 "§34-19-16
174 (a) A licensed midwife may provide midwifery care in
175 the setting of the client's choice, except a hospital.
176 (b) A licensed midwife shall ensure that the client has
177 signed a midwife disclosure form provided by the board
178 indicating receipt of a written statement that includes all of
179 the following information:
180 (1) A description of the licensed midwife's education,
181 training, and experience in midwifery.
182 (2) Antepartum, intrapartum, and postpartum conditions
183 requiring medical referral, transfer of care, and transport to
184 a hospital.
185 (3) A plan for medical referral, transfer of care, and
186 transport of the client or newborn or both when indicated by
187 specific antepartum, intrapartum, or postpartum conditions.
188 (4) Instructions for filing a complaint against a
189 licensed midwife.
190 (5) A statement that the licensed midwife must comply
191 with the federal Health Insurance Portability and
192 Accountability Act.
193 (6) The status of a licensed midwife's professional
194 liability insurance coverage.
195 (7) References to current evidence regarding the safety
196 of midwifery care in out-of-hospital settings, including a
Page 7

of midwifery care in out-of-hospital settings, including a
HB128 Enrolled
197 copy of the most recent statement by the American Congress of
198 Obstetricians and Gynecologists on home birth.
199 (c) A licensed midwife shall ensure that the client has
200 signed an informed consent form provided by the board.
201 (d) For screening purposes only, a licensed midwife may
202 order routine antepartum and postpartum laboratory analyses to
203 be performed by a licensed laboratory.
204 (e) After a client has secured the services of a
205 licensed midwife, the licensed midwife shall document an
206 emergency care plan on a form provided by the board.
207 (f) A licensed midwife shall determine the progress of
208 labor and, when birth is imminent, shall be available until
209 delivery is accomplished.
210 (g) A licensed midwife shall remain with the client
211 during the postpartalpostpartum period until the conditions of
212 the client and newborn are stabilized.
213 (h) A licensed midwife shall instruct the client
214 regarding the requirements of the administration of eye
215 ointment ordered by the Alabama Department of Public Health
216 pursuant to Section 22-20-2.
217 (i) A licensed midwife shall instruct the client
218 regarding the requirements of administration of newborn health
219 screening ordered by the Alabama Department of Public Health
220 pursuant to Section 22-20-3.
221 (j) A licensed midwife shall file a birth certificate
222 for each birth in accordance with the requirements of Section
223 22-9A-7.
224 (k) A licensed midwife shall collect clinical data
Page 8

(k) A licensed midwife shall collect clinical data
HB128 Enrolled
225 under the Midwives Alliance of North America Statistics
226 Project for each client who initiates care and shall submit a
227 copy of the clinical data collected for each consenting client
228 to the board upon request.
229 (l)(k) A licensed midwife shall report to the Alabama
230 Department of Public Health pursuant to Chapter 11A, of Title
231 22, and any other law that requires hospitals or physicians to
232 report to the Alabama Department of Public Health.
233 (m)(l) A licensed midwife shall provide all information
234 required to be provided to new mothers pursuant to Section
235 22-20-3.1, and all information required to be provided to new
236 mothers before discharge by hospitals, as defined in Section
237 22-21-20.
238 (n)(m) A licensed midwife shall order those tests,
239 provided in Section 22-20-3 and any rule adopted by the State
240 Board of Health pursuant to that section relating to the
241 newborn screening program, to all neonates in his or her care.
242 (o)(n) A licensed midwife may order and administer a
243 urinalysis or blood glucose test as indicated."
244 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
245 1, 2026.
Page 9

1, 2026.
HB128 Enrolled
246
247
248
249
250
251
252
253
254
255
256 ________________________________________________
257 Speaker of the House of Representatives
258
259
260
261 ________________________________________________
262 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
263
264
265 House of Representatives
266
267 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
268 was passed by the House 20-Jan-26.
269
270 John Treadwell
271 Clerk
272
273
274
275
276
277 Senate 01-Apr-26 Passed
278
279
280
Page 10